California statutes. Labor Code
-------------------------------------------

2699.5.

(a) The provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 2699.3 apply to any alleged violation of the following provisions: subdivision (k) of Section 96, Sections 98.6, 201, 201.3, 201.5, 201.7, 202, 203, 203.1, 203.5, 204, 204a, 204b, 204.1, 204.2, 205, 205.5, 206, 206.5, 208, 209, and 212, subdivision (d) of Section 213, Sections 221, 222, 222.5, 223, 224,
 230, 230.1, 230.2, 230.3, 230.4, 230.7, 230.8, and 231, subdivision (c) of Section 232, subdivision (c) of Section 232.5, Sections 233, 234, 351, 353, and 403, subdivision (b) of Section 404, Sections 432.2, 432.5, 432.7, 435, 450,
 511, 551, 552, 601, 602, 603, 604, 750, 751.8, 800, 850, 851, 851.5, 852, 921, 922, 923, 970, 973, 976, 1021, 1021.5, 1025, 1026, 1101, 1102, 1102.5, and 1153, subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1174, Sections 1197.5, and 1198, subdivision (b) of Section 1198.3, Sections 1199, 1199.5, 1290, 1292, 1293, 1293.1, 1294, 1294.1, 1294.5, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1301, 1308, 1308.1, 1308.7, 1309, 1309.5, 1391, 1391.1, 1391.2, 1392, 1683, and 1695, subdivision (a) of Section 1695.5, Sections 1695.55, 1695.6, 1695.7, 1695.8, 1695.9, 1696, 1696.5, 1696.6, 1697.1, 1700.25, 1700.26, 1700.31, 1700.32, 1700.40, and 1700.47, Sections 1735, 1771, 1774, 1776, 1777.5, 1811, 1815, 2651, and 2673, subdivision (a) of Section 2673.1, Sections 2695.2,
 2801, 2806, and 2810, subdivision (b) of Section 2929, and Sections 3073.6, 6310, 6311, and 6399.7.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to a civil action brought on or after June 19, 2024.

(2) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to a civil action with respect to which the notice required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2699.3 was filed before June 19, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 45, Sec. 3.   (SB 92)   Effective July 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2699.6.

(a) This part shall not apply to an employee in the construction industry with respect to work performed under a valid collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees, premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked, and for the employee to receive a regular hourly pay rate of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate, and the agreement does all of the following:

(1) Prohibits all of the violations of this code that would be redressable pursuant to this part and provides for a grievance and binding arbitration procedure to redress those violations.

(2) Expressly waives the requirements of this part in clear and unambiguous terms.

(3) Authorizes the arbitrator to award any and all remedies otherwise available under this code, provided that nothing in this section authorizes the award of penalties under this part that would be payable to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(b) Except for a civil action under Section 2699, this section does not preclude an employee from pursuing any other civil action against an employer, including, but not limited to, an action for a violation of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code), Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352), or any other prohibition of discrimination or harassment.

(c) For purposes of this section, “employee in the construction industry” means an employee performing work associated with construction, including work involving alteration, demolition, building, excavation, renovation, remodeling, maintenance, improvement, repair work, and any other work as described by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and other similar or related occupations or trades.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2038, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2038, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2699.8.

(a) This part shall not apply to a janitorial employee represented by a labor organization that has represented janitors before January 1, 2021, and employed by a janitorial contractor who registered as a property service employer pursuant to Section 1423 in calendar year 2020, with respect to work performed under a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect any time before July 1, 2028, that expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees, provides premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked, and does all of the following:

(1) Requires the employer to pay all nonprobationary workers working in certain worksites, defined in an applicable collective bargaining agreement, total hourly compensation, inclusive of wages, health insurance, pension, training, vacation, holiday, and fringe benefit funds, amounting to not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate.

(2) Prohibits all of the violations of this code that would be redressable pursuant to this part, provides for a grievance and binding arbitration procedure to redress those violations, and allows the labor organization to pursue a grievance on behalf of all affected employees.

(3) Expressly waives the requirements of this part in clear and unambiguous terms.

(4) Authorizes the arbitrator to award any and all remedies otherwise available under this code, provided that nothing in this section authorizes the award of penalties under this part that would be payable to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(b) Except for a civil action under Section 2699, nothing in this section precludes an employee from pursuing any other civil action against an employer, including, but not limited to, an action for a violation of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352), or any other prohibition of discrimination or harassment.

(c) Any janitorial contractor who has entered into an agreement that meets the criteria in subdivision (a) above shall, within 60 days of entering the agreement, share with the Labor and Workforce Development Agency the following information:

(1) The name of the janitorial contractor.

(2) The name of the labor organization.

(3) The number of employees covered by the agreement.

(4) The duration of the agreement.

(d) The exception provided by this section shall expire on the date the collective bargaining agreement expires or on July 1,
 2028, whichever is earlier.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for purposes of this section, “janitorial employee” means an employee whose primary duties are to clean and keep in an orderly condition commercial working areas and washrooms, or the premises of an office, multiunit residential facility, industrial facility, health care facility, amusement park, convention center, stadium, racetrack, arena, or retail establishment. Duties of a janitorial employee involve one or more of the following:

(A) Disinfecting, vacuuming, sweeping, mopping, or scrubbing, and polishing floors.

(B) Removing trash and other refuse and sorting recyclable material
 therefrom.

(C) Dusting equipment, furniture, or fixtures.

(D) Polishing metal fixtures or trimmings.

(E) Providing supplies in minor maintenance services.

(F) Cleaning laboratories, showers, and restrooms.

(2) For purposes of this section, “janitorial employee” does not include any of the following:

(A) Workers who specialize in window washing.

(B) Housekeeping staff who make beds and change linens as a primary responsibility.

(C) Workers
 working at airport facilities or cabin cleaning.

(D) Workers at hotels, card clubs, restaurants, or other food service operations.

(E) Grocery store employees and drug-retail employees.

(f) This section shall not apply to existing cases filed before the effective date of this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall prevent a janitorial employee from filing an action under Section 2699.3 if there is a finding by a court or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction that the labor organization has breached its duty of fair representation in relation to a claim under Section 2699.3.

(h) 
 This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS [2700. - 3122.4.]



CHAPTER 1. Scope of Division [2700. - 2700.]

2700.

The provisions of this division shall not limit, change, or in any way qualify the provisions of Divisions 4 and 4.5 of this code, but shall be fully operative and effective in all cases where the provisions of Divisions 4 and 4.5 are not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Employer and Employee [2750. - 2930.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Contract of Employment [2750. - 2755.]

2750.

The contract of employment is a contract by which one, who is called the employer, engages another, who is called the employee, to do something for the benefit of the employer or a third person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2750.5.

There is a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that a worker performing services for which a license is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or who is performing such services for a person who is required to obtain such a license is an employee rather than an independent contractor. Proof of independent contractor status includes satisfactory proof of these factors:

(a) That the individual has the right to control and discretion as to the manner of performance of the contract for services in that the result of the work and not the means by which it is accomplished is the primary factor bargained for. 

(b) That the individual is customarily engaged in an independently established business.

(c) That the individual’s independent contractor status is bona fide and not a subterfuge to avoid employee status. A bona fide independent contractor status is further evidenced by the presence of cumulative factors such as substantial investment other than personal services in the business, holding out to be in business for oneself, bargaining for a contract to complete a specific project for compensation by project rather than by time, control over the time and place the work is performed, supplying the tools or instrumentalities used in the work other than tools and instrumentalities normally and customarily provided by employees, hiring employees, performing work that is not ordinarily in the course of the principal’s work, performing work that requires a particular skill, holding a license pursuant to the Business and Professions Code, the intent by the parties that the work relationship is of an independent contractor status, or that the relationship is not severable or terminable at will by the principal but gives rise to an action for breach of contract.

In addition to the factors contained in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), any person performing any function or activity for which a license is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code shall hold a valid contractors’ license as a condition of having independent contractor status.

For purposes of workers’ compensation law, this presumption is a supplement to the existing statutory definitions of employee and independent contractor, and is not intended to lessen the coverage of employees under Division 4 and Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

2750.6.

There is a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that a physician and surgeon, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, who enters into a contract for the performance of health services on behalf of a licensed primary care clinic, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, is an independent contractor rather than an employee. Nothing in this section shall authorize the employment of a physician and surgeon to provide professional services when the employment would violate any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2750.8.

(a) The Labor Commissioner and the Employment Development Department shall administer the Motor Carrier Employer Amnesty Program pursuant to which, notwithstanding any law, an eligible motor carrier performing drayage services at any port shall be relieved of liability for statutory or civil penalties associated with the misclassification of commercial drivers as independent contractors, as provided by this program, if the eligible motor carrier executes a settlement agreement with the Labor Commissioner whereby the eligible motor carrier agrees to, among other things, properly classify all of its commercial drivers as employees.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Commercial driver” means a person who holds a valid commercial driver’s license who is hired or contracted to provide port drayage services.

(2) “Department” means the Employment Development Department.

(3) “Eligible motor carrier” means a motor carrier that shall not have any of the following on the date it applies to participate in the program:

(A) A civil lawsuit that was filed on or before December 31, 2015, pending against it in a state or federal court that alleges or involves a misclassification of a commercial driver.

(B) A penalty assessed by the department pursuant to Section 1128 of the Unemployment Insurance Code that is final imposition of that penalty.

(4) “Motor carrier” means a registered owner, lessee, licensee, or bailee of a commercial motor vehicle, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 15210 of the Vehicle Code, that operates or directs the operation of a commercial motor vehicle on a for-hire or not-for-hire basis to perform port drayage services.

(5) “Port” means any sea or river port located in this state.

(6) “Program” means the Motor Carrier Employer Amnesty Program established by this section and as provided by Article 8.6 (commencing with Section 1160) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) (1) A motor carrier shall only apply to participate in the program by doing all of the following:

(A) Submit an
 application to the Labor Commissioner, on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner. The application shall, at a minimum, require the motor carrier to establish it qualifies as an eligible motor carrier.

(B) Report on the results of a self-audit in accordance with the guidelines provided by the Labor Commissioner.

(2) A motor carrier that voluntarily or as a result of a final disposition in a civil proceeding reclassified its commercial drivers as employees on or before January 1, 2016, shall, in addition to other information requested by the Labor Commissioner, also submit with its application all of the following:

(A) Documentation demonstrating that the motor carrier reclassified its commercial drivers as employees, including the commencement period applicable to the reclassification.

(B) The identification of each commercial driver reclassified in the documents provided in subparagraph (A), the amounts paid to each commercial driver to compensate for the previous misclassification, and the time period applicable to the amount paid to each commercial driver prior to reclassification.

(C) A report of a self-audit for all commercial drivers reclassified by the motor carrier identified in subparagraphs (A) and (B), and also include a separate self-audit report for any commercial driver who is subject to reclassification, but is not identified in subparagraph (B).

(3) A proceeding or action against a motor carrier pursuant to Sections 2698 to 2699.5, inclusive, shall not be initiated after the motor carrier has submitted an application for participation in the program, but may be initiated if the motor
 carrier’s application is denied.

(4) If a motor carrier’s application to participate in the program is denied by the Labor Commissioner, the application or its submission shall not be considered an acknowledgment or admission by the motor carrier that it misclassified its commercial drivers as independent contractors, and the application or its submission shall not be construed in any way to support an evidentiary inference that the motor carrier failed to properly classify its commercial drivers as employees.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall analyze the information provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) for the purpose of evaluating the scope of a prior reclassification of an eligible motor carrier’s commercial drivers to employees and has discretionary authority to determine whether the scope was sufficient to afford relief to the misclassified commercial
 drivers.

(e) Before January 1, 2017, the Labor Commissioner, with the cooperation and consent of the department, may negotiate and execute a settlement agreement with an eligible motor carrier pursuant to the program that applied to participate in the program. The Labor Commissioner shall not execute a settlement agreement on or after January 1, 2017.

(f) Prior to the Labor Commissioner executing a settlement agreement, an eligible motor carrier shall file its contribution returns and report unreported wages and taxes for the time period it seeks relief under the settlement agreement.

(g) A settlement agreement executed by the Labor Commissioner and an eligible motor carrier pursuant to the program shall require an eligible motor carrier to do all of the following:

(1) Pay all wages, benefits, and taxes owed, if any, to or in relation to all of its commercial drivers reclassified from independent contractors to employees for the period of time from the first date of misclassification to the date the settlement agreement is executed, but not exceeding the applicable statute of limitations.

(2) Maintain any converted commercial driver positions as employee positions.

(3) Consent that any future commercial drivers hired to perform the same or similar duties as those employees converted pursuant to the settlement agreement shall be presumed to have employee status and that the eligible motor carrier shall have the burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that they are not employees in any administrative or judicial proceeding in which their employment status is an issue.

(4) Immediately after the execution of the settlement agreement, secure the workers’ compensation coverage that is legally required for the commercial drivers who were reclassified as employees, effective on or before the date the settlement agreement is executed.

(5) Provide the Labor Commissioner and the department with proof of workers’ compensation insurance coverage in compliance with paragraph (4) within five days of securing the coverage.

(6) Pay the costs authorized by subdivision (h), if required.

(7) Perform any other requirements or provisions the Labor Commissioner and the department deem necessary to carry out the intent of this section, the program, or to enforce the settlement agreement.

(h) A settlement agreement may require
 an eligible motor carrier to pay the reasonable, actual costs of the Labor Commissioner and the department for their respective review, approval, and compliance monitoring of the settlement agreement. The costs shall be deposited into the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund. The portion of the costs attributable to the department shall be transferred to the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(i) The settlement agreement may include provisions for an eligible motor carrier to make installment payments of amounts due pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (6) of subdivision (g) in lieu of a full payment. An installment payment agreement shall be included within the settlement agreement and charge interest on the outstanding amounts due at the rate prescribed in Sections 1113 and 1129 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. Interest on amounts due shall be charged from the day after the date the settlement agreement is executed. The
 settlement agreement shall contain a provision that if a motor carrier fails, without good cause, to fully comply with terms of the settlement agreement authorizing installment payments, the settlement agreement shall be null and void and the total amount of tax, interest, and penalties for the time period covered by the settlement agreement shall be immediately due and payable.

(j) The Labor Commissioner and the department may share any information necessary to carry out the program. Sharing information pursuant to this subdivision shall not constitute a waiver of any applicable confidentiality requirements and the party receiving the information shall be subject to any existing confidentiality requirements for that information.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to the program, an eligible motor carrier that executed and performed its
 obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement shall not be liable, and the Labor Commissioner or the department shall not enforce, any civil or statutory penalties, including, but not limited to, remedies available under subdivision (e) of Section 226, that might have become due and payable for the time period covered by the settlement agreement, except for the following penalties:

(A) A penalty charged under Section 1128 of the Unemployment Insurance Code that is final on the date of the settlement agreement is executed, unless the penalty is reversed by the California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board.

(B) A penalty for an amount an eligible motor carrier admitted was based on fraud or made with the intent to evade the reporting requirements set forth in this division or authorized regulations.

(C) A penalty
 based on a violation of this division or Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code and either of the following:

(i) The eligible motor carrier was on notice of a criminal investigation due to a complaint having been filed or by written notice having been mailed to the eligible motor carrier informing the motor carrier that it is under criminal investigation.

(ii) A criminal court proceeding has already been initiated against the eligible motor carrier.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to the program, an eligible motor carrier that executed and performed its obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement shall not be liable, and the Labor Commissioner or the department shall not enforce, any unpaid penalties, and interest owed on unpaid
 penalties, on or before the date the settlement agreement was executed, pursuant to Sections 1112.5, 1126, and 1127 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for the tax reporting periods for which the settlement agreement is applicable, that are owed as a result of the nonpayment of tax liabilities due to the misclassification of one or more commercial drivers as independent contractors and the reclassification of these commercial drivers as employees, except that penalties, and interest owed on penalties, established as a result of an assessment issued by the department before the date the settlement agreement was executed shall not be waived pursuant to the program.

(B) For purposes of paragraph (1), state personal income taxes required to be withheld by Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and owed by the motor carrier pursuant to Section 13070 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall not be collected, if the eligible motor carrier
 issued an information return pursuant to Section 6041A of the Internal Revenue Code reporting payment or if the commercial driver certifies that the state personal tax has been paid or that he or she has reported to the Franchise Tax Board the payment against which the state personal income tax would have been imposed.

(3) A refund or credit for any penalty or interest paid prior to the date an eligible motor carrier applied to participate in the program shall not be granted.

(4) Except for violations described in Section 2119 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the department shall not bring a criminal action for failing to report tax liabilities against an eligible motor carrier that executed and performed its obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement for the tax reporting periods subject to the settlement agreement.

(l) The statute of limitations on any claim or liability that might have been asserted against a motor carrier based on the motor carrier having misclassified a commercial driver as an independent contractor shall be tolled from the date a motor carrier applies for participation in the program through the date the Labor Commissioner either denies the motor carrier participation in the program or the motor carrier, as an eligible motor carrier, has failed to perform an obligation under the settlement agreement, whichever is later.

(m) The recovery obtained by the Labor Commissioner on behalf of a reclassified commercial driver pursuant to a settlement agreement shall be tendered to the commercial driver on the condition that the commercial driver shall execute a release of all claims the commercial driver may have against the eligible motor carrier based on the eligible motor carrier’s
 failure to classify the commercial driver as an employee. A commercial driver shall not be under any obligation to accept the terms of a settlement agreement. If a commercial driver declines to accept the terms of a settlement agreement, the commercial driver shall not be bound by the settlement agreement, except that the eligible motor carrier shall still reclassify the commercial driver as an employee and that commercial driver shall be precluded from pursuing a claim for civil penalties or statutory penalties covered by the period of time covered by the settlement agreement. If a commercial driver does not accept the terms of a settlement agreement, the motor carrier shall be excused from performing its requirement under the settlement agreement to pay the amount acknowledged in the settlement agreement to be due to that commercial driver.

(n) (1) If the Labor Commissioner determines an eligible motor carrier violated
 or failed to perform any of its obligations under a settlement agreement, the Labor Commissioner may file a civil action to enforce the settlement agreement.

(2) (A) If the Labor Commissioner files a civil action seeking only recovery of the amounts due to commercial drivers under the settlement agreement, the Labor Commissioner may obtain judicial enforcement by filing a petition for entry of judgment for the liabilities due and remaining pursuant to the settlement agreement.

(B) After filing a petition pursuant to subparagraph (A), the Labor Commissioner may file an application for an order to show cause and serve it on the eligible motor carrier. Within 60 days of the date the Labor Commissioner filed the order to show cause, the court shall hold a hearing and enter a judgment. The judgment shall be in amounts which are due and owing to commercial drivers
 pursuant to the settlement agreement with credits, if any, for applicable payments the eligible motor carrier made under the settlement agreement. A judgment entered pursuant to this paragraph shall not preclude subsequent action to recover civil penalties or statutory penalties by the Labor Commissioner, or by an employee pursuant to Sections 2698 to 2699.5, inclusive.

(3) If the court determines in any action filed by the Labor Commissioner that a motor carrier has violated or otherwise failed to perform any of its obligations under a settlement agreement, the court shall award the Labor Commissioner costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 216.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2750.9.

(a)  The Labor Commissioner and the Employment Development Department shall administer the Construction Trucking Employer Amnesty Program pursuant to which, notwithstanding any other law, an eligible construction contractor shall be relieved of liability for statutory or civil penalties associated with the misclassification of construction drivers as independent contractors, as provided by this program, if the eligible construction contractor executes a settlement agreement negotiated with, or approved by, the Labor Commissioner whereby the eligible construction contractor agrees to, among other things, properly classify all drivers performing construction work on its behalf as employees.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) (A) “Construction contract” means a contract, whether on a lump sum, time and material, cost plus, or other basis, to do any of the following:

(i) Erect, construct, alter, or repair any building or other structure, project, development, or other improvement on or to real property.

(ii) Erect, construct, alter, or repair any fixed works, including waterways and hydroelectric plants, steam and atomic electric generating plants, electrical transmission and distribution lines, telephone and telegraph lines, railroads, highways, airports, sewers and sewage disposal plants and systems, waterworks and water distribution
 systems, gas transmission and distribution systems, pipelines and other systems for the transmission of petroleum and other liquid or gaseous substances, refineries, and chemical plants.

(iii) Pave surfaces separately or in connection with any of the above works or projects.

(iv) Furnish and install the property becoming a part of a central heating, air-conditioning, or electrical system of a building or other structure, and furnish and install wires, ducts, pipes, vents, and other conduit imbedded in or securely affixed to the land or a structure on the land.

(B) “Construction contract” does not include either of the following:

(i) A contract for the sale,
 or for the sale and installation, of tangible personal property, including machinery and equipment.

(ii) The furnishing of tangible personal property under what is otherwise a construction contract if the person furnishing the property is not responsible under the construction contract for the final affixation or installation of the property furnished.

(2) “Construction contractor” means a person who agrees to perform and does perform a construction contract. Construction contractor includes subcontractors and specialty contractors and those engaged in building trades, including carpentry, bricklaying, cement work, steel work, plastering, drywall installation, sheet metal work, roofing, tile and terrazzo work, electrical work, plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, elevator installation
 and construction, painting, and persons installing floor coverings, including linoleum, floor tile, and wall-to-wall carpeting, by permanently affixing those coverings to a floor. Construction contractor includes any person required to be licensed under the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) and any person contracting with the federal government to perform a construction contract.

(3) “Construction driver” means a person who operates a motor vehicle to perform construction work on behalf of a construction contractor, utilizing a vehicle owned by the driver or a vehicle supplied by the construction contractor.

(4) “Department” means the Employment Development Department.

(5) “Eligible construction contractor” means a construction contractor that does not have either of the following on the date they apply to participate in the program:

(A) A civil lawsuit that was filed on or before December 31, 2025, pending against it in a state or federal court that alleges or involves a misclassification of a construction driver.

(B) A penalty assessed by the department pursuant to Section 1128 of the Unemployment Insurance Code that is final imposition of that penalty.

(6) “Program” means the Construction Trucking Employer Amnesty Program established by this section.

(c) (1) A construction contractor shall only apply to participate in the program by doing both of the following:

(A) Submitting an application to the Labor Commissioner, on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner. The application shall, at a minimum, require the construction contractor to establish they qualify as an eligible construction contractor.

(B) Reporting on the results of a self-audit in accordance with the guidelines provided by the Labor Commissioner.

(2) A construction contractor that voluntarily or as a result of a final disposition in a civil proceeding reclassified its construction drivers as employees on or before September 1, 2028, shall, in addition to other information
 requested by the Labor Commissioner, also submit with its application all of the following:

(A) Documentation demonstrating that the construction contractor reclassified their construction drivers as employees, including the commencement period applicable to the reclassification.

(B) The identification of each construction driver reclassified in the documents provided in subparagraph (A), the amounts paid to each construction driver to compensate for the previous misclassification, and the time period applicable to the amount paid to each construction driver prior to reclassification.

(C) A report of a self-audit for all construction drivers reclassified by the construction contractor identified in subparagraphs
 (A) and (B), and also include a separate self-audit report for any construction driver who is subject to reclassification, but is not identified in subparagraph (B).

(3) A proceeding or action against a construction contractor pursuant to Sections 2698 to 2699.5, inclusive, shall not be initiated after the construction contractor has submitted an application for participation in the program, but may be initiated if the construction contractor’s application is denied.

(4) If a construction contractor’s application to participate in the program is denied by the Labor Commissioner, the application or its submission shall not be considered an acknowledgment or admission by the construction contractor that they misclassified their construction drivers as independent contractors, and the
 application or its submission shall not be construed in any way to support an evidentiary inference that the construction contractor failed to properly classify their construction drivers as employees.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall analyze the information provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) for the purpose of evaluating the scope of a prior reclassification of an eligible construction contractor’s construction drivers to employees and has discretionary authority to determine whether the scope was sufficient to afford relief to the misclassified construction drivers.

(1) Before January 1, 2029, the Labor Commissioner, with the cooperation and consent of the department, may negotiate and execute a settlement agreement with an eligible construction contractor
 that applied to participate in the program. The Labor Commissioner shall not execute a settlement agreement on or after January 1, 2029.

(2) Before January 1, 2029, an eligible construction contractor may negotiate a settlement agreement with a labor union representing its drivers, or with any city attorney, and shall submit that settlement agreement to the Labor Commissioner, who shall review and may approve that settlement agreement under the program. The Labor Commissioner shall not approve a settlement
 agreement on or after January 1, 2029.

(e) Prior to the Labor Commissioner executing or approving a settlement agreement, an eligible construction contractor shall file their contribution returns and report unreported wages and taxes to the department for the time period the construction contractor seeks relief under the settlement agreement.

(f) A settlement agreement executed or approved by the Labor Commissioner involving an eligible construction contractor pursuant to the program shall require an eligible construction contractor to do all of the following:

(1) Pay all wages, benefits, and taxes owed, if any, to
 or in relation to all of its construction drivers reclassified from independent contractors to employees for the period of time from the first date of misclassification to the date the settlement agreement is executed, but not exceeding the applicable statute of limitations. The settlement shall include interest on unpaid taxes at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and interest for unpaid wages at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code.

(2) Maintain any converted construction driver positions as employee positions.

(3) Consent that any future construction drivers hired to perform the
 same or similar duties as those employees converted pursuant to the settlement agreement shall be presumed to have employee status and that the eligible construction contractor shall have the burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that they are not employees in any administrative or judicial proceeding in which their employment status is an issue.

(4) Immediately after the execution of the settlement agreement, secure the workers’ compensation coverage that is legally required
 for the construction drivers who were reclassified as employees, effective on or before the date the settlement agreement is executed.

(5) Provide the Labor Commissioner with proof of workers’ compensation insurance coverage in compliance with paragraph (4) within five days of securing the coverage.

(6) Pay the costs authorized by subdivision (g), if required.

(7) Perform any other requirements or provisions the Labor Commissioner and the department deem necessary to carry out the intent of this section, the program, or to enforce the settlement agreement.

(g) A settlement agreement may require an eligible construction contractor to pay the reasonable, actual costs of the Labor Commissioner and the department for their respective review, approval, and compliance monitoring of the settlement agreement. The costs shall be deposited into the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund. The portion of the costs attributable to the department shall be transferred to the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(h) The settlement agreement may include provisions for an eligible construction contractor to make installment payments of amounts due pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (6) of subdivision (f) in lieu of a full payment. The period of installment payments shall not exceed 24 months from the date the settlement